New York, session 2025-2026, S6538.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 138 of the public service law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (b-1) to read as follows: 3 (b-1) In addition to the uniform standards and conditions for the 4 siting, design, construction and operation of major renewable energy 5 facilities established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, 6 the office shall establish in consultation with the department of envi- 7 ronmental conservation uniform standards and conditions for the coloring 8 of wind turbine rotor blades. The uniform standards and conditions 9 established pursuant to this paragraph shall be designed to avoid or 10 minimize, to the maximum extent practicable, any bird collisions arising 11 from the siting, design, construction and operation of a major renewable 12 energy facility utilizing wind turbines. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 14 a determination has been made by the federal aviation administration to 15 allow for the coloring of wind turbine rotor blades; provided, however, 16 that: 17 (a) the office of renewable energy siting shall notify the legislative 18 bill drafting commission upon the occurrence of such determination made 19 by the federal aviation administration to allow for the coloring of wind 20 turbine rotor blades in order that the commission may maintain an accu- 21 rate and timely effective database of the official text of the laws of 22 the state of New York in furtherance of effecting the provisions of 23 section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the public offi- 24 cers law; and 25 (b) the amendments to subdivision 1 of section 138 of the public 26 service law made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal 27 of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02746-01-5